Utah statutes.
17-23-15.   Removal, destruction, or defacement of monuments or corners as misdemeanor -- Costs.

(1)  No person shall willfully or negligently remove, destroy, or deface any government survey monument, corner, or witness corner.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor and is additionally responsible for:

(a)  the costs of any necessary legal action; and

(b)  the costs of reestablishing the survey monument, corner, or witness corner.

